Maine, session 132, LD382.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
CONCEPT DRAFT
SUMMARY
This bill is a concept draft pursuant to Joint Rule 208.
This bill would establish a fair and equitable system of revenue sharing for the
commercial, industrial and recreational use and management of Maine's coastal resources
that ensures a direct benefit to the communities most affected by the use of those resources
and that promotes statewide economic growth. The bill would establish a standardized fee
and royalty schedule for the use of those resources based on the type and scale of activities
conducted and a formula for the distribution of the revenue generated, with a portion of the
funds to be retained by the State to support the administration, enforcement and oversight
of coastal resource activities and a portion of the funds to be distributed to affected
communities and stakeholders. Under the bill, collection of established fees and royalties
and distribution of that revenue would be administered and overseen by a statutorily
established revenue sharing board consisting of representatives from state agencies,
municipal governments and other stakeholders.
Page 1 - 132LR0608(01)